Massachusetts, session 194th, H2722.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 98F of Chapter 41 is hereby amended by striking out in the last
sentence the word "18" and inserting in place thereof the following word:- "25".
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any special or general laws to the contrary, Chapter 41 of
the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 98F the following section:-
Section 98FF. (a) There shall be within the Executive Office of Public Safety a Fresh
Start Program to: (i) serve the purpose of removing the negative collateral consequences,
including but not limited to difficulty in gaining employment, mental health challenges, and
varied other barriers to social and economic mobility, of past stories reported online about an
individual’s criminal offense(s) or other events as deemed applicable by the program; (ii) allow
of 3

any individual the opportunity to submit a request to update, remove, or anonymize a story
published online through a specified media outlet(s); (iii) share written recommendations to
specified media outlets with respect to each individual's request for changes to past stories based
upon the review of the program, providing that all media outlets will be encouraged to accept the
recommended decisions of the program; and (iv) include the promotion of diverse marketing and
promotion efforts to ensure awareness of this program to the general public.
(b) There shall be a Fresh Start Coordinating Council that will be responsible for: (a)
identifying best practices for pre-publication reporting and unpublishing protocols; (b)
establishing a set of guidelines for the review of applications submitted by all individuals based
upon the above mentioned best practices, providing that such guidelines shall be adopted only
after the approval of the Council by a majority vote in the affirmative of those members so
voting; (d) providing recommendations to the Secretary of the Executive Office of Public Safety
and Security for the appointment of the Director of the Fresh Start Program, known as the
Director; (e) developing best practices and journalistic standards for the reporting or un-reporting
of any offenses committed by young adults under the age of 25; and (f) approving and managing
any appeal process for final decisions of all applications based on the guidelines set by the
Council.
(c) The Council shall consist of twenty-five members to be appointed with the approval
of the Governor. Said Council members shall advise the Director in all matters relating to
oversight and supervision of the program. The Council shall be comprised of the following
members: one of whom shall be a member of the house of representatives to be appointed by the
Speaker of the House, one of whom shall be a member of the Senate to be appointed by the
Senate President; one of whom shall be the Secretary of Public Safety and Security or a
of 3

designee; not more than ten representatives from daily newspapers or other media outlets in
Massachusetts that have an online publication; one of whom shall be the executive director of the
American Civil Liberties Union of Massachusetts, Inc. or a designee; one of whom shall be the
Chief Justice of the Trial Court or designee; one of whom shall be the president of the
Massachusetts Major City Chiefs of Police Association; one of whom shall be the Chief Counsel
of the Committee for Public Counsel Services or designee; one of whom shall be the President of
the Massachusetts District Attorney Association or designee; three of whom have past histories
of incarceration to be appointed by the Secretary of the Executive Office of Public Safety and
Security; and no less than four of whom to be appointed by the Governor, including
representatives of two organizations dedicated to serving justice-involved young adults. Said
members shall elect a chairperson and shall meet at least quarterly for a minimum of two-year
terms as set by the Secretary. The Council shall submit a report annually by July 1 to the
governor and the clerks of the senate and house. The report shall include: (i) data related to the
percentage of applications received; (ii) periodic benchmarks for, and strategies to achieve, any
stated goals; (iii) data demonstrating the number and percentage of decisions that were accepted
by media outlets; and (iv) any additional recommendations or findings.
of 3